Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-625
Approval by electors; governing body; duties.

If the construction of a viaduct or subway is approved by the electors as provided in section 18-624, the governing body of the city or village shall (1) by resolution approve the detailed plans and specifications for such construction, including a map showing the exact location of such viaduct or subway, (2) by resolution make provision for the assumption of liability, the payment of consequential damages to property owners resulting from such proposed construction, and the payment of damages for property taken therefor, and (3) award and pay damages as provided in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1949, c. 28, § 7, p. 106;

Laws 1953, c. 39, § 1, p. 133;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 60.